lexc/verb/enhuigesablon.lexc
!!!enhuige.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols  +Verb[gcat] +Rep +Imper +Pot
                   +Inf +Inf11 +Inf12 +Inf13 +Inf21 +Inf22 +Inf23 +Pref+  +Adv +Advan
                  +IndefSg1   +IndefSg2   +IndefSg3   +IndefSg12
                  +IndefPl1 +IndefPl2 +IndefPl3
                  +DefSg1   +DefSg2   +DefSg3  
                  +DefPl1 +DefPl2 +DefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg12 +PastDefSg12  +CondDefSg12
                  +ConjIndefSg1   +ConjIndefSg2   +ConjIndefSg3   
                  +ConjIndefPl1 +ConjIndefPl2 +ConjIndefPl3
                  +ConjDefSg1   +ConjDefSg2[lfea]   +ConjDefSg3  
                  +ConjDefPl1 +ConjDefPl2 +ConjDefPl3
                  +PastIndefSg1   +PastIndefSg2   +PastIndefSg3   
                  +PastIndefPl1 +PastIndefPl2 +PastIndefPl3
                  +PastDefSg1   +PastDefSg2   +PastDefSg3  
                  +PastDefPl1 +PastDefPl2 +PastDefPl3
                  +CondIndefSg1   +CondIndefSg2   +CondIndefSg3   
                  +CondIndefPl1 +CondIndefPl2 +CondIndefPl3
                  +CondDefSg1   +CondDefSg2   +CondDefSg3  
                  +CondDefPl1 +CondDefPl2 +CondDefPl3
      
§AA§ §AAA§ §igea§ §igeo§ §igeo2§ §igeu§ §igeuo§
§igejakik1§ §igejatokitek1§ §igeija1§ §igeaa§ §igetattet§
§felteo§  §j§ §szorelol§ §tatt§ §l§
§sj§ 
§AAmely§ §AAAmely§ §igeamely§ §igeomely§ §igeo2mely§ §igeumely§ 
§igejakik1mely§ §igejatokitek1mely§ §igeija1mely§ §igeaamely§ §igetattetmely§ §igeuomely§
§felteomely§ §szorelolmely§
§igeoo§ §igeoomely§


LEXICON Root
Verb;
Prefigekoto;

LEXICON Prefigekoto
+Pref+:keresztül   Verb;
+Pref+:kölcsön   Verb;
+Pref+:széjjel   Verb;
+Pref+:szembe   Verb;
+Pref+:szerte   Verb;
+Pref+:vissza   Verb;
+Pref+:helyre   Verb;
+Pref+:tovább   Verb;
+Pref+:tönkre   Verb;
+Pref+:észre   Verb;
+Pref+:rajta   Verb;
+Pref+:előre   Verb;
+Pref+:félbe   Verb;
+Pref+:félre   Verb;
+Pref+:felül   Verb;
+Pref+:fölül   Verb;
+Pref+:agyon   Verb;
+Pref+:ellen   Verb;
+Pref+:körbe   Verb;
+Pref+:körül   Verb;
+Pref+:közbe   Verb;
+Pref+:közre   Verb;
+Pref+:külön   Verb;
+Pref+:utána   Verb;
+Pref+:végbe   Verb;
+Pref+:végig   Verb;
+Pref+:hátra   Verb;
+Pref+:hozzá   Verb;
+Pref+:egybe   Verb;
+Pref+:ketté   Verb;
+Pref+:össze   Verb;
+Pref+:mellé   Verb;
+Pref+:által   Verb;
+Pref+:alul   Verb;
+Pref+:haza   Verb;
+Pref+:újra   Verb;
+Pref+:abba   Verb;
+Pref+:neki   Verb;
+Pref+:bele   Verb;
+Pref+:újjá   Verb;
+Pref+:benn   Verb;
+Pref+:fenn   Verb;
+Pref+:fönn   Verb;
+Pref+:jóvá   Verb;
+Pref+:szét   Verb;
+Pref+:tele   Verb;
+Pref+:tova   Verb;
+Pref+:meg   Verb;
+Pref+:oda   Verb;
+Pref+:elő   Verb;
+Pref+:túl   Verb;
+Pref+:alá   Verb;
+Pref+:föl   Verb;
+Pref+:ide   Verb;
+Pref+:fel   Verb;
+Pref+:rá   Verb;
+Pref+:ki   Verb;
+Pref+:le   Verb;
+Pref+:el   Verb;
+Pref+:át   Verb;
+Pref+:be   Verb;

LEXICON Verb


!ír
!írhat  potential
!irathat imper potential
!irat imper
!irattattat imper imper
!irjon command
!írhasson
!írogattathat rep imper pot
!íratgathat
!írogattatgat
!Irni
!írnék, írnál .. írnának cond conditional
! írjak írjon írj  command

LEXICON AddVerb
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Rep;

LEXICON Rep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteo§g§AA§t  Imper;
                    Imper1;

LEXICON Imper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep2;
LEXICON Imper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Nrep;
                      Nrep1;

LEXICON Nrep
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;
LEXICON Nrep2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper2;

LEXICON Nrep1
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteo§g§AA§t  NImper;
                      NImper1;

LEXICON NImper
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;
LEXICON NImper2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot2;

LEXICON NImper1
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AA§t  Pot;
                      Pot1;

LEXICON Pot
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;
LEXICON Pot2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case;

LEXICON Pot1
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAA§t  AddInf;
             Case; ! case1 if differs
LEXICON AddInf
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeo§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeo§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AA§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeu§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeo§t§igeo§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeu§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuo§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaa§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AA§  #;
              Case;
LEXICON Case
+IndefSg1:^+cIndefSg1^§igeo§k    #;    ! ek/ok
+IndefSg2:^+cIndefSg2^§szorelol§ #;    ! esz, el/ol
+IndefSg3:^+cIndefSg3^           #;    !
+IndefPl1:^+cIndefPl1^§igeu§nk   #;    ! ünk/unk
+IndefPl2:^+cIndefPl2^t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tek/tok
+IndefPl3:^+cIndefPl3^n§igea§k   #;    ! nek/nak
+DefSg1:^+cDefSg1^§igeo§m        #;    ! em/om
+DefSg2:^+cDefSg2^§igeo§d        #;    ! ed/od
+DefSg3:^+cDefSg3^§igeija1§       #;    ! i/sa
+DefPl1:^+cDefPl1^§j§§igeu§k      #;    ! jük/suk
+DefPl2:^+cDefPl2^§igejatokitek1§ #;    ! itek/sátok
+DefPl3:^+cDefPl3^§igejakik1§     #;    ! ik/sák
+ConjIndefSg1:^+cConjIndefSg1^§sj§§igea§k     #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§§igeaa§l    #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§ék          #;
+ConjIndefSg2:^+cConjIndefSg2^§sj§           #;
+ConjIndefSg3:^+cConjIndefSg3^§sj§§igeo§n     #;
+ConjIndefPl1:^+cConjIndefPl1^§sj§§igeu§nk    #;
+ConjIndefPl2:^+cConjIndefPl2^§sj§§igea§t§igeo§k       #;
+ConjIndefPl3:^+cConjIndefPl3^§sj§§igea§n§igea§k      #;
+ConjDefSg1:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igea§m         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§§igea§d         #;
+ConjDefSg2[lfea]:^+cConjDefSg2^§sj§d              #;
+ConjDefSg3:^+cConjDefSg3^§sj§§igea§          #;
+ConjDefPl1:^+cConjDefPl1^§sj§§igeu§k         #;
+ConjDefPl2:^+cConjDefPl2^§sj§§igeaa§t§igeo§k     #;
+ConjDefPl3:^+cConjDefSg1^§sj§§igeaa§k            #;
+PastIndefSg1:^+cPIndefSg1^t§AA§m            #;    ! tem/tam
+PastIndefSg2:^+cPIndefSg2^t§igeaa§l         #;    ! tál/tél
+PastIndefSg3:^+cPIndefSg3^§igetattet§t      #;    ! t
+PastIndefPl1:^+cPIndefPl1^t§igeu§nk         #;    ! tünk/tunk
+PastIndefPl2:^+cPIndefPl2^t§igea§t§igeo2§k  #;    ! tetek/tatok
+PastIndefPl3:^+cPIndefPl3^t§igea§k          #;    ! tek/tak
+PastDefSg1:^+cPDefSg1^t§igea§m              #;    ! tem/tam
+PastDefSg2:^+cPDefSg2^t§igea§d              #;    ! tad/ted
+PastDefSg3:^+cPDefSg3^t§igea§               #;    ! ta/te
+PastDefPl1:^+cPDefPl1^t§igeu§k              #;    ! tuk/tük
+PastDefPl2:^+cPDefPl2^t§igeaa§t§igeo2§k     #;    ! tátok/tétek
+PastDefPl3:^+cPDefPl3^t§igeaa§k             #;    ! ták/ték
+CondIndefSg1:^+cCIndefSg1^nék               #;    ! nék
+CondIndefSg2:^+cCIndefSg2^n§igeaa§l         #;    ! nál/nél
+CondIndefSg3:^+cCIndefSg3^n§igea§           #;    ! na/ne
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeaa§nk            #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondIndefPl1:^+cCIndefPl1^n§igeoo§k #;
+CondIndefPl2:^+cCIndefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k      #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondIndefPl3:^+cCIndefPl3^n§igeaa§n§igea§k      #;    ! nának/nének
+CondDefSg1:^+cCDefSg1^n§igeaa§m                 #;    ! nám/ném
+CondDefSg2:^+cCDefSg2^n§igeaa§d                 #;    ! nád/néd
+CondDefSg3:^+cCDefSg3^n§igeaa§                  #;    ! ná/né
+CondDefPl1:^+cCDefPl1^n§igeaa§nk                #;    ! nánk/nénk
+CondDefPl2:^+cCDefPl2^n§igeaa§t§igeo§k          #;    ! nátok/nétek
+CondDefPl3:^+cCDefPl3^n§igeaa§k                 #;    ! nák/nék
+IndefSg12:^+cIndefSgp12^§l§§igea§k           #;    !
+ConjDefSg12:^+cConjDefSgp12^§sj§§igea§l§igea§k          #;
+PastDefSg12:^+cPDefSgp12^t§igea§l§igea§k               #;    ! ta/te
+CondDefSg12:^+cCDefSgp12^n§igeaa§l§igea§k                  #;    ! ná/né


LEXICON AddVerbmely
[stem]+Verb[gcat]:0     Repmely;

LEXICON Repmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cRep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  Impermely;
                    Imper1mely;

LEXICON Impermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrepmely2;
LEXICON Imper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Nrepmely;
                      Nrep1mely;

LEXICON Nrepmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;
LEXICON Nrepmely2
+Rep:^+cNrep^g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImpermely2;

LEXICON Nrep1mely
+Rep:^+cNrep^§felteomely§g§AAmely§t  NImpermely;
                      NImper1mely;

LEXICON NImpermely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;
LEXICON NImpermely2
+Imper:^+cImp^t§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely2;

LEXICON NImper1mely
+Imper:^+cImp^§tatt§§AAmely§t  Potmely;
                      Potmely;

LEXICON Potmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely;
             Casemely;
LEXICON Potmely2
+Pot:^+cPot^h§AAAmely§t  AddInfmely;
             Casemely;
LEXICON AddInfmely
+Inf11:^+ccInf11^n§igeomely§m #;
+Inf12:^+ccInf12^n§igeomely§d #;
+Inf13:^+ccInf13^ni§AAmely§ #;
+Inf21:^+ccInf21^n§igeumely§nk #;
+Inf22:^+ccInf22^n§igeomely§t§igeomely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeumely§k #;
+Inf23:^+ccInf23^ni§igeuomely§k #;
+Inf:^+cInf^ni  #;
+Advan:^+ccAdvan^v§igeaamely§n #;
+Adv:^+cAdv^v§AAmely§  #;
                    Casemely;
